Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-332
Highway, defined.

Highway means the entire width between the boundary limits of any street, road, avenue, boulevard, or way which is publicly maintained when any part thereof is open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 32.